Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-148
Winding up.

(RULLCA 702) (a) A dissolved limited liability
company shall wind up its activities, and the company continues after dissolution
only for the purpose of winding up.

(b) In winding up its
activities, a limited liability company:

(1) shall:

(A) discharge the company's debts, obligations, or
other liabilities, settle and close the company's activities, and marshal
and distribute the assets of the company; and

(B) deliver to the Secretary of
State for filing a statement of dissolution stating the name of the company
and that the company is dissolved; and

(2) may:

(A) preserve the company activities and property as
a going concern for a reasonable time;

(B) prosecute and defend actions and proceedings,
whether civil, criminal, or administrative;

(C) transfer the company's property;

(D) settle disputes by
mediation or arbitration;

(E)
deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of termination stating
the name of the company and that the company is terminated; and

(F) perform other acts
necessary or appropriate to the winding up.

(c) If a dissolved limited liability company has no
members, the legal representative of the last person to have been a member
may wind up the activities of the company. If the person does so, the person
has the powers of a sole manager under subsection (c) of section 21-136 and
is deemed to be a manager for the purposes of subdivision (a)(2) of section
21-129.

(d)
If the legal representative under subsection (c) of this section declines
or fails to wind up the company's activities, a person may be appointed to
do so by the consent of transferees owning a majority of the rights to receive
distributions as transferees at the time the consent is to be effective. A
person appointed under this subsection:

(1) has the powers of a sole manager under subsection
(c) of section 21-136 and is deemed to be a manager for the purposes of subdivision
(a)(2) of section 21-129; and

(2) shall promptly deliver to the Secretary of State
for filing an amendment to the company's certificate of organization to:

(A) state that the company
has no members;

(B)
state that the person has been appointed pursuant to this subsection to wind
up the company; and

(C)
provide the street and mailing addresses of the person.

(e) The district court
may order judicial supervision of the winding up of a dissolved limited liability
company, including the appointment of a person to wind up the company's activities:

(1) on application of
a member, if the applicant establishes good cause;

(2) on the application of a transferee,
if:

(A)
the company does not have any members;

(B) the legal representative of the last person to
have been a member declines or fails to wind up the company's activities;
and

(C)
within a reasonable time following the dissolution a person has not been appointed
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section; or

(3) in connection with a proceeding
under subdivision (a)(4) or (5) of section 21-147.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 48.